West Virginia, session 2025, SB213.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3.  LIMITATIONS ON AGENCY SPENDING. §12-3-21. Limitation on agencies' use of funding. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, there is no spending authority for any political subdivision or state agency for the purposes of challenging a West Virginia state law.